Missouri, session 2026, HB1783.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 192.021, to read as follows:
192.021. 1. The department of health and senior services shall be authorized to
contract directly with a Missouri affiliate of a national public health association or
public health institute, or a similar or successor entity, in order to assist in carrying out
its duties to promote the health and wellbeing of the residents of this state. Such
contracts may include, but not be limited to, efforts to assist in the delivery of health
services to residents throughout the state and the administration of grant funds and
related programs.
2. Within sixty days after the end of each fiscal year, the department and the
designated affiliate shall provide the general assembly with an annual report and
accounting of any appropriations and grant funds received and expended by the
designated affiliate pursuant to this section during the immediate prior fiscal year and
may provide recommendations and suggestions for improvement in services provided.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.